Washington statutes.
RCW 18.44.051

Branch offices—Issuance of license.

Upon the filing of the application for an escrow agent branch office and satisfying the requirements of this chapter, the director shall issue and deliver to the applicant a license to engage in the business of an escrow agent at the branch location set forth on the license.

[ 1999 c 30 s 29; 1977 ex.s. c 156 s 27. Formerly RCW 18.44.340.]